North Carolina, session 2025, SB485.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-213 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(5b) The term "atmospheric modification" means stratospheric aerosol injection
(SAI), cloud seeding, electromagnetic radio frequency or microwave radiation
emissions, or other atmospheric polluting activity affecting temperature,
weather, intensity of sunlight, the environment, agriculture, wildlife, human
health and safety, aviation, state security, or the economy of the State. The
term does not include the application of pesticides via aircraft under a license
issued by the Pesticide Board pursuant to Article 52 of this Chapter."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143-215.108(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(5) Intentionally inject, release, or disperse, by any means, chemicals, chemical
compounds, substances, or apparatus within the borders of this State into the
atmosphere with the intentional and sole purpose of atmospheric
modification."
SECTION 3. The Environmental Management Commission shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S485-v-1*